hunspell-en-ru/ru_RU.aff
SFX 230 Y 37
SFX 230 0 а [вн] #Пушкин --> Пушкина (м.р.ед.ч.р.п.+ж.р.ед.ч.и.п.)
SFX 230 0 у [вн] #Пушкин --> Пушкину (м.р.ед.ч.д.п.+ж.р.ед.ч.в.п.)
SFX 230 0 ой [вн] #Пушкин --> Пушкиной (ж.р.ед.ч.р.п.+д.п.+т.п.+п.п.)
SFX 230 0 ым [вн] #Пушкин --> Пушкиным (м.р.ед.ч.т.п.+мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX 230 0 е [вн] #Пушкин --> Пушкине (м.р.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX 230 0 ы [вн] #Пушкин --> Пушкины (мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX 230 0 ых [вн] #Пушкин --> Пушкиных (мн.ч.р.п.+п.п.)
SFX 230 0 ыми [вн] #Пушкин --> Пушкиными (мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX 230 й го ой #Донской --> Донского (м.р.ед.ч.р.п.+в.п.)
SFX 230 ий ого ий #Достоевский --> Достоевского (м.р.ед.ч.р.п.+в.п.)
SFX 230 ый ого ый #Калюжный --> Калюжного (м.р.ед.ч.р.п.+в.п.)
SFX 230 й му ой #Донской --> Донскому (м.р.ед.ч.д.п.)
SFX 230 ий ому ий #Достоевский --> Достоевскому (м.р.ед.ч.д.п.)
SFX 230 ый ому ый #Калюжный --> Калюжного (м.р.ед.ч.д.п.)
SFX 230 ой им ой #Донской --> Донским (м.р.ед.ч.т.п.+мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX 230 й м ий #Достоевский --> Достоевским (м.р.ед.ч.т.п.+мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX 230 й м ый #Калюжный --> Калюжным (м.р.ед.ч.т.п.+мн.ч.д.п.)
SFX 230 й м ой #Донской --> Донском (м.р.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX 230 ий ом ий #Достоевский --> Достоевском (м.р.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX 230 ый ом ый #Калюжный --> Калюжном (м.р.ед.ч.п.п.)
SFX 230 ой ие ой #Донской --> Донские (мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX 230 ий ие ий #Достоевский --> Достоевские (мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX 230 ый ые ый #Калюжный --> Калюжные (мн.ч.и.п.)
SFX 230 ой их ой #Донской --> Донских (мн.ч.р.п.+п.п.)
SFX 230 ий их ий #Достоевский --> Достоевских (мн.ч.р.п.+п.п.)
SFX 230 ый ых ый #Калюжный --> Калюжных (мн.ч.р.п.+п.п.)
SFX 230 ой ими ой #Донской --> Донскими (мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX 230 ий ими ий #Достоевский --> Достоевскими (мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX 230 ый ыми ый #Калюжный --> Калюжными (мн.ч.т.п.)
SFX 230 ой ая ой #Донской --> Донская (ж.р.ед.ч.и.п.)
SFX 230 ий ая ий #Достоевский --> Достоевская (ж.р.ед.ч.и.п.)
SFX 230 ый ая ый #Калюжный --> Калюжная (ж.р.ед.ч.и.п.)
SFX 230 ой ую ой #Донской --> Донскую (ж.р.ед.ч.в.п.)
SFX 230 ий ую ий #Достоевский --> Достоевскую (ж.р.ед.ч.в.п.)
SFX 230 ый ую ый #Калюжный --> Калюжную (ж.р.ед.ч.в.п.)
SFX 230 ий ой ий #Достоевский --> Достоевской (ж.р.ед.ч.р.п.+т.п.+п.п.)
SFX 230 ый ой ый #Калюжный --> Калюжной (ж.р.ед.ч.р.п.+т.п.+п.п.)

SFX 231 Y 25
SFX 231   ь    и            ь
SFX 231   онок атами        онок
SFX 231   онок атам         онок
SFX 231   онок атах         онок
SFX 231   онок ата          онок
SFX 231   онок ат           онок
SFX 231   ок   ку           нок
SFX 231   ок   ком          нок
SFX 231   ок   ке           нок
SFX 231   ок   ка           нок
SFX 231   енок ятами        енок
SFX 231   енок ятам         енок
SFX 231   енок ятах         енок
SFX 231   енок ята          енок
SFX 231   енок ят           енок
SFX 231   ая   ую           ая
SFX 231   ая   ой           ая
SFX 231   а    у            а
SFX 231   а    ой           а
SFX 231   ёнок ятами        ёнок
SFX 231   ёнок ятам         ёнок
SFX 231   ёнок ятах         ёнок
SFX 231   ёнок ята          ёнок
SFX 231   ёнок ят           ёнок
SFX 231   0    ю            ь

SFX 232 Y 25
SFX 232   ь    и            ь
SFX 232   онок атами        онок
SFX 232   онок атам         онок
SFX 232   онок атах         онок
SFX 232   онок ата          онок
SFX 232   онок ат           онок
SFX 232   ок   ку           нок
SFX 232   ок   ком          нок
SFX 232   ок   ке           нок
SFX 232   ок   ка           нок
SFX 232   енок ятами        енок
SFX 232   енок ятам         енок
SFX 232   енок ятах         енок
SFX 232   енок ята          енок
SFX 232   енок ят           енок
SFX 232   ая   ую           ая
SFX 232   ая   ой           ая
SFX 232   а    у            а
SFX 232   а    ой           а
SFX 232   ёнок ятами        ёнок
SFX 232   ёнок ятам         ёнок
SFX 232   ёнок ятах         ёнок
SFX 232   ёнок ята          ёнок
SFX 232   ёнок ят           ёнок
SFX 232   0    ю            ь

SFX 233 Y 2
SFX 233   e     ing        e
SFX 233   0     ing        [^e]

SFX 234 Y 52
SFX 234   ый   ому          ый
SFX 234   ый   ом           ый
SFX 234   ый   ого          ый
SFX 234   ьня  ен           ьня
SFX 234   ь    ями          ь
SFX 234   ь    ям           ь
SFX 234   ь    ях           ь
SFX 234   ь    я            ь
SFX 234   ь    и            ь
SFX 234   ь    ем           ь
SFX 234   ь    ей           ь
SFX 234   ь    е            ь
SFX 234   ь    ю            ь
SFX 234   ь    ём           ь
SFX 234   я    ь            [аеиоуы]ня
SFX 234   я    й            [еиу]я
SFX 234   я    и            я
SFX 234   я    ей           я
SFX 234   я    ею           я
SFX 234   я    е            [^и]я
SFX 234   я    ю            я
SFX 234   я    ёй           я
SFX 234   я    ёю           я
SFX 234   ок   ку           ок
SFX 234   ок   ком          ок
SFX 234   ок   ке           ок
SFX 234   ок   ка           ок
SFX 234   ой   им           ой
SFX 234   ня   ен           [^аеийоуьыз]ня
SFX 234   йня  ен           йня
SFX 234   й    му           ой
SFX 234   й    м            ый
SFX 234   й    м            ой
SFX 234   й    м            ий
SFX 234   й    го           ой
SFX 234   ий   ому          ий
SFX 234   ий   ом           ий
SFX 234   ий   ого          ий
SFX 234   ек   ку           ек
SFX 234   ек   ком          ек
SFX 234   ек   ке           ек
SFX 234   ек   ка           ек
SFX 234   ец   цу           ец
SFX 234   ец   це           ец
SFX 234   ец   ца           ец
SFX 234   0    ым           [^цейкояжьшщч]
SFX 234   0    у            [^цейкояь]
SFX 234   0    ми           я
SFX 234   0    м            я
SFX 234   0    х            я
SFX 234   0    е            [^цейкояь]
SFX 234   0    а            [^цейкояь]

SFX 235 Y 2
SFX 235   e     ing        e
SFX 235   0     ing        [^e]

SFX 236 Y 52
SFX 236   ый   ому          ый
SFX 236   ый   ом           ый
SFX 236   ый   ого          ый
SFX 236   ьня  ен           ьня
SFX 236   ь    ями          ь
SFX 236   ь    ям           ь
SFX 236   ь    ях           ь
SFX 236   ь    я            ь
SFX 236   ь    и            ь
SFX 236   ь    ем           ь
SFX 236   ь    ей           ь
SFX 236   ь    е            ь
SFX 236   ь    ю            ь
SFX 236   ь    ём           ь
SFX 236   я    ь            [аеиоуы]ня
SFX 236   я    й            [еиу]я
SFX 236   я    и            я
SFX 236   я    ей           я
SFX 236   я    ею           я
SFX 236   я    е            [^и]я
SFX 236   я    ю            я
SFX 236   я    ёй           я
SFX 236   я    ёю           я
SFX 236   ок   ку           ок
SFX 236   ок   ком          ок
SFX 236   ок   ке           ок
SFX 236   ок   ка           ок
SFX 236   ой   им           ой
SFX 236   ня   ен           [^аеийоуьыз]ня
SFX 236   йня  ен           йня
SFX 236   й    му           ой
SFX 236   й    м            ый
SFX 236   й    м            ой
SFX 236   й    м            ий
SFX 236   й    го           ой
SFX 236   ий   ому          ий
SFX 236   ий   ом           ий
SFX 236   ий   ого          ий
SFX 236   ек   ку           ек
SFX 236   ек   ком          ек
SFX 236   ек   ке           ек
SFX 236   ек   ка           ек
SFX 236   ец   цу           ец
SFX 236   ец   це           ец
SFX 236   ец   ца           ец
SFX 236   0    ым           [^цейкояжьшщч]
SFX 236   0    у            [^цейкояь]
SFX 236   0    ми           я
SFX 236   0    м            я
SFX 236   0    х            я
SFX 236   0    е            [^цейкояь]
SFX 236   0    а            [^цейкояь]

SFX 237 N 2
SFX 237   y     ieth       y
SFX 237   0     th         [^y]

SFX 238 Y 14
SFX 238   я    и            я
SFX 238   я    ей           я
SFX 238   я    ею           я
SFX 238   я    е            [^и]я
SFX 238   я    ю            я
SFX 238   й    ю            [ео]й
SFX 238   а    ы            [^гхкжшщч]а
SFX 238   а    у            а
SFX 238   а    ой           [^цжшщч]а
SFX 238   а    ою           [^цжшщч]а
SFX 238   а    и            [гхкжшщч]а
SFX 238   а    ей           ща
SFX 238   а    ею           ща
SFX 238   а    е            а

SFX 239 N 2
SFX 239   y     ieth       y
SFX 239   0     th         [^y]

SFX 240 Y 14
SFX 240   я    и            я
SFX 240   я    ей           я
SFX 240   я    ею           я
SFX 240   я    е            [^и]я
SFX 240   я    ю            я
SFX 240   й    ю            [ео]й
SFX 240   а    ы            [^гхкжшщч]а
SFX 240   а    у            а
SFX 240   а    ой           [^цжшщч]а
SFX 240   а    ою           [^цжшщч]а
SFX 240   а    и            [гхкжшщч]а
SFX 240   а    ей           ща
SFX 240   а    ею           ща
SFX 240   а    е            а

SFX 241 Y 30
SFX 241   ьня  ен           ьня
SFX 241   ька  ек           ька
SFX 241   я    ь            [аеиояуы]ня
SFX 241   я    й            [еиу]я
SFX 241   я    и            я
SFX 241   я    ей           я
SFX 241   я    ею           я
SFX 241   я    е            [^и]я
SFX 241   я    ю            я
SFX 241   ня   ен           [^аеийояуьыз]ня
SFX 241   ка   ок           [^юацеийояужьышч]ка
SFX 241   ка   к            [юаеиояуы]ка
SFX 241   ка   ек           [цжшч]ка
SFX 241   йня  ен           йня
SFX 241   йка  ек           йка
SFX 241   а    ы            [^гхкжшщч]а
SFX 241   а    у            а
SFX 241   а    ой           [^цжшщч]а
SFX 241   а    ою           [^цжшщч]а
SFX 241   а    и            [гхкжшщч]а
SFX 241   а    ей           [цшщч]а
SFX 241   а    ею           [цшщч]а
SFX 241   а    е            а
SFX 241   а    0            [^к]а
SFX 241   0    ми           я
SFX 241   0    ми           а
SFX 241   0    м            я
SFX 241   0    м            а
SFX 241   0    х            я
SFX 241   0    х            а

SFX 242 Y 30
SFX 242   ьня  ен           ьня
SFX 242   ька  ек           ька
SFX 242   я    ь            [аеиояуы]ня
SFX 242   я    й            [еиу]я
SFX 242   я    и            я
SFX 242   я    ей           я
SFX 242   я    ею           я
SFX 242   я    е            [^и]я
SFX 242   я    ю            я
SFX 242   ня   ен           [^аеийояуьыз]ня
SFX 242   ка   ок           [^юацеийояужьышч]ка
SFX 242   ка   к            [юаеиояуы]ка
SFX 242   ка   ек           [цжшч]ка
SFX 242   йня  ен           йня
SFX 242   йка  ек           йка
SFX 242   а    ы            [^гхкжшщч]а
SFX 242   а    у            а
SFX 242   а    ой           [^цжшщч]а
SFX 242   а    ою           [^цжшщч]а
SFX 242   а    и            [гхкжшщч]а
SFX 242   а    ей           [цшщч]а
SFX 242   а    ею           [цшщч]а
SFX 242   а    е            а
SFX 242   а    0            [^к]а
SFX 242   0    ми           я
SFX 242   0    ми           а
SFX 242   0    м            я
SFX 242   0    м            а
SFX 242   0    х            я
SFX 242   0    х            а
